Utah statutes.
59-12-1905.   Certified service provider or model 2 seller reliance on
commission certified software.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2) and subject to Subsection (4), a
certified service provider or model 2 seller is not liable for failing to
collect a tax required under this part if:
(a)  the certified service provider or model 2 seller relies on software the
commission certifies; and
(b)  the certified service provider's or model 2 seller's failure to collect a
tax required under this part is as a result of the seller's or certified
service provider's reliance on incorrect data:
(i)  provided by the commission; or
(ii)  in the software the commission certifies.
(2)  The relief from liability described in Subsection (1) does not apply if a
certified service provider or model 2 seller incorrectly classifies an item or
transaction into a product category the commission certifies.
(3)  If the taxability of a product category is incorrectly classified in
software the commission certifies, the commission shall:
(a)  notify a certified service provider or model 2 seller of the incorrect
classification of the taxability of a product category in software the
commission certifies; and
(b)  state in the notice required by Subsection (3)(a) that the certified
service provider or model 2 seller is liable for failing to collect the
correct amount of tax under this part on the incorrectly classified product
category if the certified service provider or model 2 seller fails to correct
the taxability of the item or transaction within ten days after the day on
which the certified service provider or model 2 seller receives the notice.
(4)  If a certified service provider or model 2 seller fails to correct the
taxability of an item or transaction within ten days after the day on which
the certified service provider or model 2 seller receives the notice described
in Subsection (3), the certified service provider or model 2 seller is liable
for failing to collect the correct amount of tax under this part on the item
or transaction.
